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DIC2Q-03

DTC P2 118/89| Throttle Actuator Control Motor Current
Range/Performance

*: ETCS trouble code No. is 13.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The Electronic Throttle Control System (ETCS) has a dedicated power supply circuit. The voltage (+BM) is
monitored and when the voltage is low (less than 4V), the engine control ECU concludes that the ETCS has

a fault and current to the throttle control motor is cut.

When the voltage becomes unstable, the ETCS itself becomes unstable. For this reason, when the voltage
is low, the current to the motor is cut. If repairs are made and the system has returned to normal, turn the
ignition switch to OFF. The engine control ECU then allows current to flow to the motor and the motor can

be restarted.
HINT:

This Electrical Throttle Control System (ETCS) does not use a throttle cable.
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition

Trouble Area

Open in ETCS power source (+BM) circuit
P2118/89 . . .
(1 trip detection logic)

*Openin ETCS power source circuit

*ETCSfuse

* Engine control ECU

MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The engine control ECU monitors the battery supply voltage applied to the electronic throttle motor. When
the power supply voltage drops below the threshold, the engine control ECU concludes that the power sup-
ply has an open circuit. A DTC is set and the MIL is turned on.
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FAIL SAFE

If the ETCS (Electronic Throttle Control System) has a malfunction, the engine control ECU cuts off current

to the throttle control motor. The throttle control valve returns to a predetermined opening angle (approxi-
mately 16 °) by the force ofthe return spring. The engine control ECU then adjusts the engine output by con-
trolling the fuelinfection (intermittentfuel ~ —cut) andignitiontiming in accordance with the accelerator pedal
opening angle to enable the vehicle to continue at a minimum speed.

If the accelerator pedal is depressed firmly and slowly, the vehicle can be driven slowly.

Ifa”pass” conditionis detected and thenthe ignition switchisturned OFF, the fail -safe operation will stop
and the system will return to normal condition.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the hand-held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Check ETCS fuse.
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PREPARATION:

Remove the ETCS fuse from the engine room J/B.

CHECK:

Check the continuity of the ETCS fuse.

OK:

Continuity

NG>

Check for short in all harness and components
connected to ETCS fuse.

2 | Check voltage between terminal +BM and E1 of engine control ECU connector.
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Engine Control ECU Connector
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CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E9
and E10 engine control ECU connector.

OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

+BM (E10 -6) - E7 (E9 1) 9to 14V

0K>

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI-3).




DIAGNOSTICS -

DI-215
ENGINE

3 | Check for open or short in harness or connector between battery and ETCS fuse,
ETCS fuse and engine control ECU.
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OK

Check the harness and the connector between the ETCS
fuse and the engine control ECU:

PREPARATION:

(@ Remove the ETCS fuse from the engine room J/B.

(b) Disconnect the E10 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.

OK:

Tester Connection

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal2) - +BM(E10 -6)

Specified Condition

Below1 Q

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal2) or+BM (E10 -6) -
Body ground
Check the harness and connector between the ETCS fuse

and the battery:

PREPARATION:

(a) Removethe ETCS fuse fromthe engine room J/B.

(o) Disconnect the battery positive terminal.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.

OK:

10k Q orhigher

Tester Connection

Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal 1) - Battery positive terminal
Engine Room J/B (ETCS fuse
terminal 1) or
Battery positiveterminal - Body ground

e )

Specified Condition

Below1 Q

10k Q orhigher

Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check engine room J/B.
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